North Carolina statutes. Chapter 104. United States Lands.
Article 1. Authority for Acquisition.

§ 104-1.
Acquisition of lands for specified purposes authorized; concurrent jurisdiction reserved.

The United States is authorized, by purchase or otherwise, to acquire title to any tract or parcel of land in the State of North Carolina, not exceeding 25 acres, for the purpose of erecting thereon any customhouse, courthouse, post office, or other building, including lighthouses, lightkeepers’ dwellings, lifesaving stations, buoys and local depots and buildings connected therewith, or for the establishment of a fish-cultural station and the erection thereon of such buildings and improvements as may be necessary for the successful operations of such fish-cultural station. The consent to acquisition by the United States is upon the express condition that the State of North Carolina shall so far retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over such lands as that all civil and criminal process issued from the courts of the State of North Carolina may be executed thereon in like manner as if this authority had not been given, and that the State of North Carolina also retains authority to punish all violations of its criminal laws committed on any such tract of land.

History.

1870-1, c. 44, s. 5; Code, ss. 3080, 3083; 1887, c. 136; 1899, c. 10; Rev., s. 5426; C.S., s. 8053.

Legal Periodicals.

As to note on jurisdiction relative to lands acquired by the federal government, see 23 N.C.L. Rev. 258 (1945).

§ 104-2.
Unused lands to revert to State.

The consent given in

G.S. 104-1

is upon consideration of the United States building lighthouses, lighthouse keepers’ dwellings, lifesaving stations, buoys, coal depots, fish stations, post offices, customhouses, and other buildings connected therewith, on the tracts or parcels of land so purchased, or that may be purchased; and that the title to land so conveyed to the United States shall revert to the State unless the construction of the aforementioned buildings be completed thereon within 10 years from the date of the conveyance from the grantor.

History.

1870-1, c. 44, s. 5; Code, ss. 3080, 3083; 1887, c. 136; 1899, c. 10; Rev., s. 5426; C.S., s. 8054.

§ 104-3.
Exemption of such lands from taxation.

The lots, parcels, or tracts of land acquired under this Chapter, together with the tenements and appurtenances for the purpose mentioned in this Chapter, shall be exempt from taxation.

History.

1870-1, c. 44, s. 3; Code, s. 3082; Rev., s. 5428; C.S., s. 8055.

§ 104-4.
Conveyances of such lands to be recorded.

All deeds, conveyances, or other title papers for the same shall be recorded, as in other cases, in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the lands so conveyed may lie, in the same manner and under the same regulations as other deeds and conveyances are now recorded, and in like manner may be recorded a sufficient description by metes and bounds, courses and distances, of any tract or legal division of any public land belonging to the United States, which may be set apart by the general government for the purpose before mentioned, by an order, patent, or other official document or paper so describing such land.

History.

1870-1, c. 44, s. 2; 1872-3, c. 201; Code, s. 3081; Rev., s. 5429; C.S., s. 8056.

§ 104-5.
Forest reserve in North Carolina authorized; powers conferred.

The United States is authorized to acquire by purchase, or by condemnation with adequate compensation, except as hereinafter provided, such lands in North Carolina as in the opinion of the federal government may be needed for the establishment of a national forest reserve in that region. This consent is given upon condition that the State of North Carolina shall retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over such lands so far that civil process in all cases, and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the State of North Carolina against any person charged with the commission of any crime without or within said jurisdiction, may be executed thereon in like manner as if this consent had not been given. Power is hereby conferred upon the Congress of the United States to pass such laws as it may deem necessary to the acquisition as hereinbefore provided, for incorporation in such national forest reserve such forest-covered lands lying in North Carolina as in the opinion of the federal government may be needed for this purpose, but as much as 200 acres of any tract of land occupied as a home by bona fide residents in this State on the eighteenth day of January, 1901, shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. Power is hereby conferred upon Congress to pass such laws and to make or provide for the making of such rules and regulations, of both civil and criminal nature, and to provide punishment therefor, as in its judgment may be necessary for the management, control, and protection of such lands as may be from time to time acquired by the United States under the provisions of this section.

History.

1901, c. 17; Rev., s. 5430; C.S., s. 8057; 1929, c. 67, s. 1.

§ 104-6.
Acquisition of lands for river and harbor improvement; reservation of right to serve process.

The consent of the legislature of the State is hereby given to the acquisition by the United States of any tracts, pieces, or parcels of land within the limits of the State, by purchase or condemnation, for use as sites for locks and dams, or for any other purpose in connection with the improvement of rivers and harbors within and on the borders of the State. The consent hereby given is in accordance with the seventeenth clause of the eighth section of the first article of the Constitution of the United States, and with the acts of Congress in such cases made and provided; and this State retains concurrent jurisdiction with the United States over any lands acquired and held in pursuance of the provisions of this section, so far as that all civil and criminal process issued under authority of any law of this State may be executed in any part of the premises so acquired, or the buildings or structures thereon erected.

History.

1907, c. 681; C.S., s. 8058.

§ 104-7.
Acquisition of lands by the United States for customhouses, courthouses, post offices, forts, arsenals, or armories; cession of jurisdiction; exemption from taxation.

The consent of the State is hereby given, in accordance with the seventeenth clause, eighth section, of the first article of the Constitution of the United States, to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, of any land in the State that either is:

Required for customhouses, courthouses, post offices, forts, arsenals, or armories; provided that the total land to be acquired for a particular facility does not exceed 25 acres; or

To be added to Fort Bragg, Pope Air Force Base, Camp Lejeune, New River Marine Corps Air Station, Seymour Johnson Air Force Base, Cherry Point Marine Corps Air Station, Military Ocean Terminal at Sunny Point, or the United States Coast Guard Air Station at Elizabeth City. Any of the land to be added to a military base named in this subdivision shall be contiguous to and within a 25-mile radius of the military base for which the property is acquired.

(a1)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) above, the consent of the State is not given to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase, condemnation or otherwise, of any land in a county or counties which have no existing military base at which aircraft squadrons are stationed, for the purpose of establishing an outlying landing field to support training and operations of aircraft squadrons stationed at or transient to military bases or military stations located outside of the State. Exclusive jurisdiction in and over any land acquired by the United States without the consent of the State under this subsection is not ceded to the United States for any purpose.

Exclusive jurisdiction in and over any land acquired by the United States with the consent of the State under subsection (a) of this section is hereby ceded to the United States for all purposes for which the United States requests cession of jurisdiction except that jurisdiction in and over these lands with respect to: (i) the service of all civil and criminal process of the courts of this State, (ii) the concurrent power to enforce the criminal law, (iii) the power to enforce State laws for the protection of public health and the environment and for the conservation of natural resources, and (iv) the entire legislative jurisdiction of the State with respect to marriage, divorce, annulment, adoption, commitment of the mentally incompetent, and descent and distribution of property is reserved to the State. Cession of jurisdiction shall continue only so long as the United States owns the land.

The jurisdiction ceded shall not vest until the United States has acquired title to the land by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise; accepted the cession of jurisdiction in writing; and filed a certified copy of the acceptance in the office of the register of deeds in the county or counties in which the land is located.

So long as land acquired with the consent of the State under subsection (a) of this section remains the property of the United States, and no longer, the land shall be exempt and exonerated from all State, county, and municipal taxation, assessment, or other charges that may be levied or imposed under the authority of this State.

Persons residing on lands in the State for which any jurisdiction has been ceded under this section shall not be deprived of any civil or political rights, including the right of suffrage, by reason of the cession of jurisdiction to the United States.

History.

1907, c. 25; C.S., s. 8059; 2005-69, s. 1; 2009-20, s. 1; 2012-18, s. 1.16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-69, s. 1, effective May 27, 2005, rewrote this section.

Session Laws 2009-20, s. 1, effective April 30, 2009, added subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.16, effective July 1, 2012, deleted the former last two sentences of subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

As to note on jurisdiction relative to lands acquired by federal government, see 23 N.C.L. Rev. 258 (1945).

For case law survey on jurisdiction over federal enclave, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 451 (1963).

§ 104-8.
Further authorization of acquisition of land.

The United States is hereby authorized to acquire lands by condemnation or otherwise in this State for the purpose of preserving the navigability of navigable streams and for holding and administering such lands for national park purposes: Provided, that this section and

G.S. 104-9

shall in nowise affect the authority conferred upon the United States and reserved to the State in

G.S. 104-5

and 104-6.

History.

1925, c. 152, s. 1.

§ 104-9.
Condition of consent granted in preceding section.

This consent is given upon condition that the State of North Carolina shall retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over such lands so far that civil process in all cases, and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the State of North Carolina against any person charged with the commission of any crime, without or within said jurisdiction, may be executed thereon in like manner as if this consent had not been given.

History.

1925, c. 152, s. 2.

§ 104-10.
Migratory bird sanctuaries or other wildlife refuges.

The United States is authorized to acquire by purchase, or by condemnation with adequate compensation, such lands in North Carolina as in the opinion of the federal government may be needed for the establishment of one or more migratory bird sanctuaries or other wildlife refuges. This consent is given upon condition that the State of North Carolina shall retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over such lands so far that civil process in all cases, and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the State of North Carolina against any person charged with the commission of any crime without or within said jurisdiction, may be executed therein in like manner as if this consent had not been given. Power is hereby conferred upon the Congress of the United States to pass such laws as it may deem necessary to the acquisition as hereinbefore provided, for incorporation in such sanctuaries or refuges such lands lying in North Carolina as in the opinion of the federal government may be suitable and needed for this purpose. Power is hereby conferred upon Congress to pass such laws and to make or provide for the making of such rules and regulations, of both civil and criminal nature, and to provide punishment therefor, as in its judgment may be necessary for the management, control and protection of such lands as may be from time to time acquired by the United States under the provisions of this section.

History.

1929, c. 163, s. 1.

§ 104-11.
Utilities Commission to secure rights-of-way, etc., for waterway improvements by use of federal funds.

Hereafter whenever any waterway improvement in North Carolina by the use of federal funds is provided for upon condition that the State or locality shall furnish rights-of-way, permits for the dumping of dredged material, or furnish or do any other thing in connection with the proposed waterway improvement, the Utilities Commission is authorized and empowered to represent the State or locality in such matter of securing the rights-of-way, permits for the dumping of dredged material, or other things so required in connection with such waterway improvement; and in prosecuting such undertaking, the Utilities Commission may follow the same procedure provided in Article 2 for the acquisition of rights-of-way for the intercoastal waterway from the Cape Fear River to the South Carolina line: Provided, however, that said Utilities Commission is not hereby authorized to enter into obligation or contract for the payment of any money or proceeds through condemnation or otherwise without the express approval of the Governor and Council of State.

History.

1935, c. 240; 1937, c. 434.

§ 104-11.1.
Governor may accept a retrocession of jurisdiction over federal areas.

Whenever a duly authorized official or agent of the United States, acting pursuant to authority conferred by the Congress, notifies the Governor or any other State official, department or agency, that the United States desires or is willing to relinquish to the State the jurisdiction, or a portion thereof, held by the United States over the lands designated in such notice, the Governor may, in his discretion, accept such relinquishment. Such acceptance may be made by sending a notice of acceptance to the official or agent designated by the United States to receive such notice of acceptance. The Governor shall send a signed copy of the notice of acceptance, together with the notice of relinquishment received from the United States, to the Secretary of State, who shall maintain a permanent file of said notices.

Upon the sending of said notice of acceptance to the designated official or agent of the United States, the State shall immediately have such jurisdiction over the lands designated in the notice of relinquishment as said notice shall specify.

The provisions of this section shall apply to the relinquishment of jurisdiction acquired by the United States under the provisions of this Chapter or any other provision of law.

History.

1957, c. 1202.